Alaska, session 34, HB160.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 14.12.050 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 05 (d) The governing body of a municipality may by ordinance alter the terms of 06 office provided for in this section. 07 * Sec. 2. AS 29.20.300(a) is amended to read: 08 (a) Each municipal school district has a school board. Except as provided in 09 (b) or (c) of this section, members of a school board are elected at the regular election 10 for three-year terms and until their successors take office. Members are elected at 11 large unless a different method of election has been approved by the voters in a regular 12 election. 13 * Sec. 3. AS 29.20.300 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 14 (c) The governing body of a municipality may by ordinance alter the terms of 01 office provided for in (a) of this section. 02 * Sec. 4. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.